Utah statutes.
17-16-9.   Officers at county seats -- Office hours.

(1)  The elected county officers of all counties, except those in counties having a population of less than 8,000, shall have their offices at the county seats.

(2) (a)  In all counties  the clerk, sheriff, recorder, auditor, treasurer, assessor, and attorney  shall keep their offices open for the transaction of business as authorized by resolution of the  county  legislative body.

(b)  If the county legislative body does not authorize hours of operation for Saturdays, then the hours served by the employees of the county shall not be less than under their present schedule.

(c) (i)  Any act authorized, required, or permitted to be performed at or by, or with respect to, any county  office on a Saturday when the county office is closed, may be performed on the next business day.

(ii)  No liability or loss of rights of any kind may result from that delay.

